Illinois, session 104th, HB3750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-707 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-707)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-707)7    Sec. 3-707. Operation of uninsured motor vehicle - 8penalty. 9    (a) No person shall operate a motor vehicle in this State 10unless the motor vehicle is covered by a liability insurance 11policy in accordance with Section 7-601 of this Code. 12    (a-5) A person commits the offense of operation of 13uninsured motor vehicle causing bodily harm when the person:14        (1) operates a motor vehicle in violation of Section 15    7-601 of this Code; and16        (2) causes, as a proximate result of the person's 17    operation of the motor vehicle, bodily harm to another 18    person.19    (a-6) Uninsured operation of a motor vehicle under 20subsection (a-5) is a Class A misdemeanor. If a person 21convicted of the offense of operation of a motor vehicle under 22subsection (a-5) has previously been convicted of 2 or more 23violations of subsection (a-5) of this Section or of Section   HB3750- 2 -LRB104 09263 LNS 19321 b17-601 of this Code, a fine of $4,500 $2,500, in addition to any 2sentence of incarceration, must be imposed. 3    (b) Any person who fails to comply with a request by a law 4enforcement officer for display of evidence of insurance, as 5required under Section 7-602 of this Code, shall be deemed to 6be operating an uninsured motor vehicle.7    (c) Except as provided in subsections (a-6) and (c-5), any 8operator of a motor vehicle subject to registration under this 9Code, or under a similar law of another state, who is convicted 10of violating this Section is guilty of a petty offense and 11shall be required to pay a fine in excess of $1,000 $500, but 12not more than $2,000 $1,000, except a person convicted of a 13third or subsequent violation of this Section shall be guilty 14of a business offense and shall be required to pay a fine of 15$2,000 $1,000. If the operator of a motor vehicle is convicted 16of violating this Section while driving with suspended license 17plates, the operator shall pay an additional fine of $2,000. 18However, no person charged with violating this Section shall 19be convicted if such person produces in court satisfactory 20evidence that at the time of the arrest the motor vehicle was 21covered by a liability insurance policy in accordance with 22Section 7-601 of this Code. The chief judge of each circuit may 23designate an officer of the court to review the documentation 24demonstrating that at the time of arrest the motor vehicle was 25covered by a liability insurance policy in accordance with 26Section 7-601 of this Code.  HB3750- 3 -LRB104 09263 LNS 19321 b1    (c-1) A person convicted of violating this Section shall 2also have his or her driver's license, permit, or privileges 3suspended for 6 3 months. After the expiration of the 6 3 4months, the person's driver's license, permit, or privileges 5shall not be reinstated until he or she has paid a 6reinstatement fee of $500 $100. If a person violates this 7Section while his or her driver's license, permit, or 8privileges are suspended under this subsection (c-1), his or 9her driver's license, permit, or privileges shall be suspended 10for an additional 12 6 months and until he or she pays a the 11reinstatement fee of $1,000. 12    (c-5) A person who (i) has not previously been convicted 13of or received a disposition of court supervision for 14violating this Section and (ii) produces at his or her court 15appearance satisfactory evidence that the motor vehicle is 16covered, as of the date of the court appearance, by a liability 17insurance policy in accordance with Section 7-601 of this Code 18shall, for a violation of this Section, other than a violation 19of subsection (a-5), pay a fine of $100 and receive a 20disposition of court supervision. The person must, on the date 21that the period of court supervision is scheduled to 22terminate, produce satisfactory evidence that the vehicle was 23covered by the required liability insurance policy during the 24entire period of court supervision.25    An officer of the court designated under subsection (c) 26may also review liability insurance documentation under this   HB3750- 4 -LRB104 09263 LNS 19321 b1subsection (c-5) to determine if the motor vehicle is, as of 2the date of the court appearance, covered by a liability 3insurance policy in accordance with Section 7-601 of this 4Code. The officer of the court shall also determine, on the 5date the period of court supervision is scheduled to 6terminate, whether the vehicle was covered by the required 7policy during the entire period of court supervision. 8    (d) A person convicted a third or subsequent time of 9violating this Section or a similar provision of a local 10ordinance must give proof to the Secretary of State of the 11person's financial responsibility as defined in Section 7-315. 12The person must maintain the proof in a manner satisfactory to 13the Secretary for a minimum period of 3 years after the date 14the proof is first filed. The Secretary must suspend the 15driver's license of any person determined by the Secretary not 16to have provided adequate proof of financial responsibility as 17required by this subsection.18(Source: P.A. 102-509, eff. 1-1-22.)